Utah statutes.
31A-8-402.7.   Discontinuance and nonrenewal limitations.
(1)  Subject to Section 31A-4-115, an insurer that elects to discontinue
offering a health benefit plan under Subsections 31A-8-402.3(3)(e) and
31A-8-402.5(3)(e) is prohibited from writing new business:
(a)  in the market in this state for which the insurer discontinues or does
not renew; and
(b)  for a period of five years beginning on the date of discontinuation of
the last coverage that is discontinued.
(2)  If an insurer is doing business in one established geographic service
area of the state, Sections 31A-8-402.3 and 31A-8-402.5 apply only to the
insurer's operations in that service area.
(3)  The commissioner may, by rule or order, define the scope of service area.
